Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.580

Ownership of parks and facilities—Expenditure of funds budgeted for park purposes.

Any park facility or park acquired, improved or otherwise financed in whole or in part by park and recreation service area funds shall be owned by the park service area and/or the county and/or the city or town in which the park or facility is located. The county may make expenditures from its current expense funds budgeted for park purposes for the maintenance, operation or capital improvement of any county park or park facility acquired, improved, or otherwise financed in whole or in part by park and recreation service area funds. Similarly, a city or town may make expenditures for any city or town park or park facility acquired, improved, or otherwise financed in whole or in part by park and recreation service area funds.

[ 1988 c 82 s 5; 1981 c 210 s 16; 1963 c 218 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.